Tennessee, session 114, HB1965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 29, Chapter 34, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Child Care
Hosting Safe Harbor Act."
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Child care provider" means a person or entity licensed under title 71,
chapter 3, part 5 to operate a child care agency or facility;
(2) "Employer" means a person or entity that subsidizes child care costs
for its employees or that hosts a child care provider on its premises; provided,
that the employer does not operate or manage the child care provider;
(3) "Host entity" means a person or entity, including but not limited to, a
nonprofit organization, faith-based organization, community organization,
educational institution, or property owner or lessee, that permits a child care
provider to operate on property the person or entity owns or controls, regardless
of whether the children served are children of employees of the host entity; and
(4) "Subsidize" means to pay all or part of the cost of child care services
on behalf of an employee or eligible child through reimbursement, direct
payment, tuition assistance, grants, or similar financial assistance.
HB1965
010867
- 1 -

(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), an employer or host entity is not liable
in a civil action for damages arising from the acts or omissions of a child care provider
that:
(1) Is licensed under state law; and
(2) Provides child care services on property owned, leased, or otherwise
made available by the employer or host entity.
(d) Subsection (c) does not apply if the employer's or host entity's gross
negligence or willful misconduct is the proximate cause of the injury, harm, or loss.
(e) This section does not apply if the employer or host entity:
(1) Operates, controls, or manages the child care provider;
(2) Is licensed as a child care provider; or
(3) Employs, supervises, or directs the child care provider's staff.
(f) The provision of space, utilities, maintenance, security, capital improvements,
or financial support to a child care provider, standing alone, does not constitute
operation, control, or management of the child care provider.
(g) This section does not limit or alter any right of action against a child care
provider.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to actions arising on or after that date.
- 2 - 010867